Tennessee, session 114, HB1698.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 3, Chapter 3, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
3-3-1__.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Employee of the executive branch" includes, but is not limited to, a
liaison, employee, or agent of the office of the governor, or the executive head or
a liaison, employee, or agent of a department or agency of the executive branch
of this state;
(2) "Legislative measure" means a proposed bill or resolution, including
an amendment to such bill or resolution; and
(3) "Material statement" means a written or oral statement that is offered
for the truth of the matter contained in the statement.
(b)
(1) The chair of a legislative committee may require an employee of the
executive branch appearing before the committee to offer a material statement
under oath or affirmation, subject to the penalty of perjury.
(2) An oath or affirmation required under subdivision (b)(1) may be
administered by the chair of the respective committee.
HB1698
009920
- 1 -

(c) The executive director of the fiscal review committee appointed pursuant to §
3-7-107 shall require an employee of the executive branch who submits a material
statement for the purpose of analyzing the fiscal impact of a legislative measure, or for
the purpose of preparing and distributing a fiscal note required under § 3-2-107, as
applicable, to execute an affidavit attesting that the material statement submitted is true
and correct, subject to the penalty of perjury.
(d)
(1) If the chair of a legislative committee or the executive director of the
fiscal review committee has reasonable suspicion supported by facts that an
employee of the executive branch has submitted a false material statement, in
whole or in part, with the intent to deceive while under oath or affirmation
pursuant to subsection (b) or subsection (c), as applicable, then the chair or
executive director shall provide written notice to:
(A) The speaker of the senate if the material statement was
germane to a legislative measure before a committee of the senate;
(B) The speaker of the house of representatives if the material
statement was germane to a legislative measure before a committee of
the house of representatives; or
(C) Both speakers if the material statement was germane to a
legislative measure before a joint committee of both houses of the
general assembly.
(2) Upon receipt of notice under subdivision (d)(1)(A) or (d)(1)(B), the
respective speaker may refer the allegation of the submission of one (1) or more
false material statements to the appropriate district attorney general for
prosecution in accordance with § 3-3-121(c). Upon receipt of notice under
- 2 - 009920

subdivision (d)(1)(C), the speakers may jointly refer such allegation to the
appropriate district attorney general for prosecution. Prior to the referral of an
allegation, the speaker or speakers, as applicable, may initiate an investigation
into the allegation for the purpose of determining whether sufficient evidence
exists to justify such referral for prosecution.
(e) An employee of the executive branch who is found to have submitted one (1)
or more false material statements under this section with the intent to deceive commits
the offense of perjury under § 39-16-702(a).
(f) This section does not apply to testimony provided or documents submitted
pursuant to a subpoena issued pursuant to this chapter 3 or § 3-7-106.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 3-3-121, is amended by adding the
following new subsection (c):
(c) A district attorney general who receives a referral for prosecution under
SECTION 1(d)(2) may prosecute the individual who is the subject of the referral in a
court of competent jurisdiction for such prosecution.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-16-702(b), is amended by adding
the following new subdivision (4):
(4) Perjury committed under SECTION 1 is a Class C misdemeanor.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 009920